sk_SK-spell/sk_SK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1447 N 1
SFX 1447 iecť ecme .
SFX 1448 N 1
SFX 1448 cť knime .
SFX 1449 N 1
SFX 1449 iecť ecte .
SFX 1450 N 1
SFX 1450 cť knite .
SFX 1451 N 1
SFX 1451 ásť astiem .
SFX 1452 N 1
SFX 1452 ásť astieš .
SFX 1453 N 1
SFX 1453 ásť astie .
SFX 1454 N 1
SFX 1454 ásť astieme .
SFX 1455 N 1
SFX 1455 ásť astiete .
SFX 1456 N 1
SFX 1456 ásť astú .
SFX 1457 N 1
SFX 1457 ásť asti .
SFX 1458 N 1
SFX 1458 ásť asť .
SFX 1459 N 1
SFX 1459 ásť astime .
SFX 1460 N 1
SFX 1460 ásť asťme .
SFX 1461 N 1
SFX 1461 ásť asťte .
SFX 1462 N 1
SFX 1462 ásť astite .
SFX 1463 N 1
SFX 1463 ásť astúc .
SFX 1464 N 1
SFX 1464 ť tol .
SFX 1465 N 1
SFX 1465 ť tla .
SFX 1466 N 1
SFX 1466 ť tlo .
SFX 1467 N 1
SFX 1467 ť tli .
SFX 1468 N 1
SFX 1468 ka ák .
SFX 1469 N 1
SFX 1469 kať čem .
SFX 1470 N 1
SFX 1470 kať češ .
SFX 1471 N 1
SFX 1471 kať če .
SFX 1472 N 1
SFX 1472 kať čeme .
SFX 1473 N 1
SFX 1473 kať čete .
SFX 1474 N 1
SFX 1474 kať ču .
SFX 1475 N 1
SFX 1475 kať č .
SFX 1476 N 1
SFX 1476 kať čme .
SFX 1477 N 1
SFX 1477 kať čte .
SFX 1478 N 1
SFX 1478 kať čuc .
SFX 1479 N 1
SFX 1479 ť nem .
SFX 1480 N 1
SFX 1480 ť neš .
SFX 1481 N 1
SFX 1481 ť ne .
SFX 1482 N 1
SFX 1482 ť neme .
SFX 1483 N 1
SFX 1483 ť nete .
SFX 1484 N 1
SFX 1484 ť nú .
SFX 1485 N 1
SFX 1485 ť ň .
SFX 1486 N 1
SFX 1486 ť ňme .
SFX 1487 N 1
SFX 1487 ť ňte .
SFX 1488 N 1
SFX 1488 ť núc .
SFX 1489 N 1
SFX 1489 cať čem .
SFX 1490 N 1
SFX 1490 cať češ .
SFX 1491 N 1
SFX 1491 cať če .
SFX 1492 N 1
SFX 1492 cať čeme .
SFX 1493 N 1
SFX 1493 cať čete .
SFX 1494 N 1
SFX 1494 cať ču .
SFX 1495 N 1
SFX 1495 cať č .
SFX 1496 N 1
SFX 1496 cať čme .
SFX 1497 N 1
SFX 1497 cať čte .
SFX 1498 N 1
SFX 1498 cať čuc .
SFX 1499 N 1
SFX 1499 ĺcť lčiem .
SFX 1500 N 1
SFX 1500 ĺcť lčieš .
SFX 1501 N 1
SFX 1501 ĺcť lčie .
SFX 1502 N 1
SFX 1502 ĺcť lčieme .
SFX 1503 N 1
SFX 1503 ĺcť lčiete .
SFX 1504 N 1
SFX 1504 ĺcť lčú .
SFX 1505 N 1
SFX 1505 ĺcť lč .
SFX 1506 N 1
SFX 1506 ĺcť lčme .
SFX 1507 N 1
SFX 1507 ĺcť lčte .
SFX 1508 N 1
SFX 1508 ĺcť lčúc .
SFX 1509 N 1
SFX 1509 dieť ď .
SFX 1510 N 1
SFX 1510 dieť ďme .
SFX 1511 N 1
SFX 1511 dieť ďte .
SFX 1512 N 1
SFX 1512 iesť ediem .
SFX 1513 N 1
SFX 1513 iesť edieš .
SFX 1514 N 1
SFX 1514 iesť edie .
SFX 1515 N 1
SFX 1515 iesť edieme .
SFX 1516 N 1
SFX 1516 iesť ediete .
SFX 1517 N 1
SFX 1517 iesť edú .
SFX 1518 N 1
SFX 1518 iesť eď .
SFX 1519 N 1
SFX 1519 iesť eďme .
SFX 1520 N 1
SFX 1520 iesť eďte .
SFX 1521 N 1
SFX 1521 iesť edúc .
SFX 1522 N 1
SFX 1522 nuť em .
SFX 1523 N 1
SFX 1523 nuť eš .
SFX 1524 N 1
SFX 1524 nuť e .
SFX 1525 N 1
SFX 1525 nuť eme .
SFX 1526 N 1
SFX 1526 nuť ete .
SFX 1527 N 1
SFX 1527 nuť i .
SFX 1528 N 1
SFX 1528 nuť ime .
SFX 1529 N 1
SFX 1529 nuť ite .
SFX 1530 N 1
SFX 1530 dnuť ol .
SFX 1531 N 1
SFX 1531 dnuť la .
SFX 1532 N 1
SFX 1532 dnuť lo .
SFX 1533 N 1
SFX 1533 dnuť li .
SFX 1534 N 1
SFX 1534 edieť iem .
SFX 1535 N 1
SFX 1535 edieť ieš .
SFX 1536 N 1
SFX 1536 edieť ie .
SFX 1537 N 1
SFX 1537 edieť ieme .
SFX 1538 N 1
SFX 1538 edieť iete .
SFX 1539 N 1
SFX 1539 bať em .
SFX 1540 N 1
SFX 1540 bať eš .
SFX 1541 N 1
SFX 1541 bať e .
SFX 1542 N 1
SFX 1542 bať eme .
SFX 1543 N 1
SFX 1543 bať ete .
SFX 1544 N 1
SFX 1544 bať i .
SFX 1545 N 1
SFX 1545 bať ime .
SFX 1546 N 1
SFX 1546 bať ite .
SFX 1547 N 1
SFX 1547 vať em .
SFX 1548 N 1
SFX 1548 vať eš .
SFX 1549 N 1
SFX 1549 vať e .
SFX 1550 N 1
SFX 1550 vať eme .
SFX 1551 N 1
SFX 1551 vať ete .
SFX 1552 N 1
SFX 1552 vať i .
SFX 1553 N 1
SFX 1553 vať ime .
SFX 1554 N 1
SFX 1554 vať ite .
SFX 1555 N 1
SFX 1555 ťať tnem .
SFX 1556 N 1
SFX 1556 ťať tneš .
SFX 1557 N 1
SFX 1557 ťať tne .
SFX 1558 N 1
SFX 1558 ťať tneme .
SFX 1559 N 1
SFX 1559 ťať tnete .
SFX 1560 N 1
SFX 1560 ťať tnú .
SFX 1561 N 1
SFX 1561 ťať tni .
SFX 1562 N 1
SFX 1562 ťať tnime .
SFX 1563 N 1
SFX 1563 ťať tnite .
SFX 1564 N 1
SFX 1564 ťať tnúc .
SFX 1565 N 1
SFX 1565 ať nem .
SFX 1566 N 1
SFX 1566 ať neš .
SFX 1567 N 1
SFX 1567 ať ne .
SFX 1568 N 1
SFX 1568 ať neme .
SFX 1569 N 1
SFX 1569 ať nete .
SFX 1570 N 1
SFX 1570 ať nú .
SFX 1571 N 1
SFX 1571 ať ni .
SFX 1572 N 1
SFX 1572 ať nime .
SFX 1573 N 1
SFX 1573 ať nite .
SFX 1574 N 1
SFX 1574 ať núc .
SFX 1575 N 1
SFX 1575 vať jem .
SFX 1576 N 1
SFX 1576 vať ješ .
SFX 1577 N 1
SFX 1577 vať je .
SFX 1578 N 1
SFX 1578 vať jeme .
SFX 1579 N 1
SFX 1579 vať jete .
SFX 1580 N 1
SFX 1580 vať jú .
SFX 1581 N 1
SFX 1581 vať j .
SFX 1582 N 1
SFX 1582 vať jme .
SFX 1583 N 1
SFX 1583 vať jte .
SFX 1584 N 1
SFX 1584 vať júc .
SFX 1585 N 1
SFX 1585 evo iev .
SFX 1586 N 1
SFX 1586 tať ctaj .
SFX 1587 N 1
SFX 1587 tať ctajte .
SFX 1588 N 1
SFX 1588 é ých .
SFX 1589 N 1
SFX 1589 é ými .
SFX 1590 N 1
SFX 1590 ory ôr .
SFX 1591 N 1
SFX 1591 er rermi .
SFX 1592 N 1
SFX 1592 ďať dím .
SFX 1593 N 1
SFX 1593 ďať díš .
SFX 1594 N 1
SFX 1594 ďať dí .
SFX 1595 N 1
SFX 1595 ďať díme .
SFX 1596 N 1
SFX 1596 ďať díte .
SFX 1597 N 1
SFX 1597 ďať dia .
SFX 1598 N 1
SFX 1598 ďať di .
SFX 1599 N 1
SFX 1599 ďať dime .
SFX 1600 N 1
SFX 1600 ďať dite .
SFX 1601 N 1
SFX 1601 ďať diac .
SFX 1602 N 1
SFX 1602 uma úm .
SFX 1603 N 1
SFX 1603 a oma .
SFX 1604 N 1
SFX 1604 a omi .
SFX 1605 N 1
SFX 1605 0 ja .
SFX 1606 N 1
SFX 1606 ťka tiek .
SFX 1607 N 1
SFX 1607 cia iec .
SFX 1608 N 1
SFX 1608 ia ami .
SFX 1609 N 1
SFX 1609 ere ier .
SFX 1610 N 1
SFX 1610 r om .
SFX 1611 N 1
SFX 1611 olo ôl .
SFX 1612 N 1
SFX 1612 opa ôp .
SFX 1613 N 1
SFX 1613 lo el .
SFX 1614 N 1
SFX 1614 yha ýh .
SFX 1615 N 1
SFX 1615 amo ám .
SFX 1616 Y 1
SFX 1616 0 a .
PFX 1616 Y 1
PFX 1616 dá da .
SFX 1617 Y 1
SFX 1617 0 u .
PFX 1617 Y 1
PFX 1617 dá da .
SFX 1618 N 1
SFX 1618 ážď aždi .
SFX 1619 Y 1
SFX 1619 0 om .
PFX 1619 Y 1
PFX 1619 dá da .
SFX 1620 N 1
SFX 1620 ážď ažde .
SFX 1621 Y 1
SFX 1621 0 ov .
PFX 1621 Y 1
PFX 1621 dá da .
SFX 1622 Y 1
SFX 1622 0 och .
PFX 1622 Y 1
PFX 1622 dá da .
SFX 1623 Y 1
SFX 1623 0 ami .
PFX 1623 Y 1
PFX 1623 dá da .
SFX 1624 N 1
SFX 1624 sť dem .
SFX 1625 N 1
SFX 1625 sť deš .
SFX 1626 N 1
SFX 1626 sť de .
SFX 1627 N 1
SFX 1627 sť deme .
SFX 1628 N 1
SFX 1628 sť dete .
SFX 1629 N 1
SFX 1629 sť du .
SFX 1630 N 1
SFX 1630 sť di .
SFX 1631 N 1
SFX 1631 sť dime .
SFX 1632 N 1
SFX 1632 sť dite .
SFX 1633 N 1
SFX 1633 sť duc .
SFX 1634 N 1
SFX 1634 ôjsť ošiel .
SFX 1635 N 1
SFX 1635 ôjsť ošla .
SFX 1636 N 1
SFX 1636 ôjsť ošlo .
SFX 1637 N 1
SFX 1637 ôjsť ošli .
SFX 1638 N 1
SFX 1638 udo úd .
SFX 1639 N 1
SFX 1639 in nami .
SFX 1640 N 1
SFX 1640 auto áut .
SFX 1641 N 1
SFX 1641 ulta últ .
SFX 1642 N 1
SFX 1642 ba ob .
SFX 1643 N 1
SFX 1643 ipsa íps .
SFX 1644 Y 1
SFX 1644 ý ejších .
PFX 1644 Y 1
PFX 1644 0 najd .
SFX 1645 N 1
SFX 1645 argo árg .
SFX 1646 N 1
SFX 1646 edo ied .
SFX 1647 N 1
SFX 1647 erto iert .
SFX 1648 N 1
SFX 1648 uro úr .
SFX 1649 N 1
SFX 1649 niaze ňazí .
SFX 1650 N 1
SFX 1650 ľby lieb .
SFX 1651 N 1
SFX 1651 lum iel .
SFX 1652 N 1
SFX 1652 ansa áns .
SFX 1653 Y 1
SFX 1653 a 0 .
PFX 1653 Y 1
PFX 1653 fa fá .
SFX 1654 N 1
SFX 1654 anga áng .
SFX 1655 N 1
SFX 1655 oš še .
SFX 1656 N 1
SFX 1656 oš ši .
SFX 1657 N 1
SFX 1657 oš šou .
SFX 1658 N 1
SFX 1658 oš ší .
SFX 1659 N 1
SFX 1659 oš šiam .
SFX 1660 N 1
SFX 1660 oš šiach .
SFX 1661 N 1
SFX 1661 oš šami .
SFX 1662 Y 1
SFX 1662 um 0 .
PFX 1662 Y 1
PFX 1662 fa fá .
SFX 1663 N 1
SFX 1663 x gu .
SFX 1664 N 1
SFX 1664 x gom .
SFX 1665 N 1
SFX 1665 x gy .
SFX 1666 N 1
SFX 1666 x gov .
SFX 1667 N 1
SFX 1667 x goch .
SFX 1668 N 1
SFX 1668 x gami .
SFX 1669 N 1
SFX 1669 udum úd .
SFX 1670 N 1
SFX 1670 ala áb .
SFX 1671 N 1
SFX 1671 asko ásk .
SFX 1672 N 1
SFX 1672 iga íb .
SFX 1673 Y 1
SFX 1673 a 0 .
PFX 1673 Y 1
PFX 1673 fi fí .
SFX 1674 N 1
SFX 1674 opta ôpt .
SFX 1675 N 1
SFX 1675 auta áut .
SFX 1676 N 1
SFX 1676 ik ka .
SFX 1677 N 1
SFX 1677 ik ku .
SFX 1678 N 1
SFX 1678 ik kom .
SFX 1679 N 1
SFX 1679 ik ky .
SFX 1680 N 1
SFX 1680 ik kov .
SFX 1681 N 1
SFX 1681 ik koch .
SFX 1682 N 1
SFX 1682 ik kami .
SFX 1683 N 1
SFX 1683 inta ínt .
SFX 1684 N 1
SFX 1684 idum íd .
SFX 1685 N 1
SFX 1685 o áh .
SFX 1686 N 1
SFX 1686 eba ieb .
SFX 1687 N 1
SFX 1687 ina íb .
SFX 1688 Y 1
SFX 1688 a 0 .
PFX 1688 Y 1
PFX 1688 fr fŕ .
SFX 1689 N 1
SFX 1689 onta ônt .
SFX 1690 N 1
SFX 1690 uga úg .
SFX 1691 N 1
SFX 1691 ňať ním .
SFX 1692 N 1
SFX 1692 ňať níš .
SFX 1693 N 1
SFX 1693 ňať ní .
SFX 1694 N 1
SFX 1694 ňať níme .
SFX 1695 N 1
SFX 1695 ňať níte .
SFX 1696 N 1
SFX 1696 ňať nia .
SFX 1697 N 1
SFX 1697 ňať niac .
SFX 1698 N 1
SFX 1698 er ry .
SFX 1699 Y 1
SFX 1699 a 0 .
PFX 1699 Y 1
PFX 1699 fľ fli .
SFX 1700 Y 1
SFX 1700 o 0 .
PFX 1700 Y 1
PFX 1700 g gi .
SFX 1701 Y 1
SFX 1701 y 0 .
PFX 1701 Y 1
PFX 1701 ga gá .
SFX 1702 N 1
SFX 1702 iba íb .
SFX 1703 N 1
SFX 1703 oty ôt .
SFX 1704 Y 1
SFX 1704 a 0 .
PFX 1704 Y 1
PFX 1704 ga gá .
SFX 1705 N 1
SFX 1705 on í .
SFX 1706 N 1
SFX 1706 on anmi .
SFX 1707 N 1
SFX 1707 ter etra .
SFX 1708 N 1
SFX 1708 azda ázd .
SFX 1709 N 1
SFX 1709 iná ín .
SFX 1710 N 1
SFX 1710 ťa te .
SFX 1711 N 1
SFX 1711 ťa ti .
SFX 1712 N 1
SFX 1712 idy íd .
SFX 1713 N 1
SFX 1713 apo áp .
SFX 1714 Y 1
SFX 1714 a 0 .
PFX 1714 Y 1
PFX 1714 gi gí .
SFX 1715 Y 1
SFX 1715 o 0 .
PFX 1715 Y 1
PFX 1715 gi gí .
SFX 1716 N 1
SFX 1716 0 s .
SFX 1717 N 1
SFX 1717 uba úb .
SFX 1718 Y 1
SFX 1718 o 0 .
PFX 1718 Y 1
PFX 1718 gu gú .
SFX 1719 N 1
SFX 1719 uča úč .
SFX 1720 N 1
SFX 1720 eľ ľovi .
SFX 1721 N 1
SFX 1721 ala ál .
SFX 1722 Y 1
SFX 1722 a 0 .
PFX 1722 Y 1
PFX 1722 ha há .
SFX 1723 N 1
SFX 1723 ra ár .
SFX 1724 N 1
SFX 1724 urda úrd .
SFX 1725 N 1
SFX 1725 en ie .
SFX 1726 N 1
SFX 1726 en ých .
SFX 1727 N 1
SFX 1727 en ým .
SFX 1728 N 1
SFX 1728 en ými .
SFX 1729 N 1
SFX 1729 en oho .
SFX 1730 N 1
SFX 1730 en omu .
SFX 1731 N 1
SFX 1731 en om .
SFX 1732 N 1
SFX 1732 en í .
SFX 1733 N 1
SFX 1733 o ie .
SFX 1734 N 1
SFX 1734 o ých .
SFX 1735 N 1
SFX 1735 o ým .
SFX 1736 N 1
SFX 1736 o ými .
SFX 1737 N 1
SFX 1737 á ie .
SFX 1738 N 1
SFX 1738 lo iev .
SFX 1739 N 1
SFX 1739 ko šie .
SFX 1740 Y 1
SFX 1740 ko šie .
PFX 1740 Y 1
PFX 1740 0 naj .
SFX 1741 N 1
SFX 1741 ký ší .
SFX 1742 N 1
SFX 1742 ký šieho .
SFX 1743 N 1
SFX 1743 ký šiemu .
SFX 1744 N 1
SFX 1744 ký šom .
SFX 1745 N 1
SFX 1745 ký ším .
SFX 1746 N 1
SFX 1746 ký ších .
SFX 1747 N 1
SFX 1747 ký šími .
SFX 1748 N 1
SFX 1748 ký šie .
SFX 1749 N 1
SFX 1749 ký šia .
SFX 1750 N 1
SFX 1750 ký šej .
SFX 1751 N 1
SFX 1751 ký šiu .
SFX 1752 N 1
SFX 1752 ký šou .
SFX 1753 Y 1
SFX 1753 ký ší .
PFX 1753 Y 1
PFX 1753 0 naj .
SFX 1754 Y 1
SFX 1754 ký šieho .
PFX 1754 Y 1
PFX 1754 0 naj .
SFX 1755 Y 1
SFX 1755 ký šiemu .
PFX 1755 Y 1
PFX 1755 0 naj .
SFX 1756 Y 1
SFX 1756 ký šom .
PFX 1756 Y 1
PFX 1756 0 naj .
SFX 1757 Y 1
SFX 1757 ký ším .
PFX 1757 Y 1
PFX 1757 0 naj .
SFX 1758 Y 1
SFX 1758 ký ších .
PFX 1758 Y 1
PFX 1758 0 naj .
SFX 1759 Y 1
SFX 1759 ký šími .
PFX 1759 Y 1
PFX 1759 0 naj .
SFX 1760 Y 1
SFX 1760 ký šie .
PFX 1760 Y 1
PFX 1760 0 naj .
SFX 1761 Y 1
SFX 1761 ký šia .
PFX 1761 Y 1
PFX 1761 0 naj .
SFX 1762 Y 1
SFX 1762 ký šej .
PFX 1762 Y 1
PFX 1762 0 naj .
SFX 1763 Y 1
SFX 1763 ký šiu .
PFX 1763 Y 1
PFX 1763 0 naj .
SFX 1764 Y 1
SFX 1764 ký šou .
PFX 1764 Y 1
PFX 1764 0 naj .
SFX 1765 N 1
SFX 1765 oko šie .
SFX 1766 Y 1
SFX 1766 oko šie .
PFX 1766 Y 1
PFX 1766 0 naj .
SFX 1767 N 1
SFX 1767 oký ší .
SFX 1768 N 1
SFX 1768 oký šieho .
SFX 1769 N 1
SFX 1769 oký šiemu .
SFX 1770 N 1
SFX 1770 oký šom .
SFX 1771 N 1
SFX 1771 oký ším .
SFX 1772 N 1
SFX 1772 oký ších .
SFX 1773 N 1
SFX 1773 oký šími .
SFX 1774 N 1
SFX 1774 oký šie .
SFX 1775 N 1
SFX 1775 oký šia .
SFX 1776 N 1
SFX 1776 oký šej .
SFX 1777 N 1
SFX 1777 oký šiu .
SFX 1778 N 1
SFX 1778 oký šou .
SFX 1779 Y 1
SFX 1779 oký ší .
PFX 1779 Y 1
PFX 1779 0 naj .
SFX 1780 Y 1
SFX 1780 oký šieho .
PFX 1780 Y 1
PFX 1780 0 naj .
SFX 1781 Y 1
SFX 1781 oký šiemu .
PFX 1781 Y 1
PFX 1781 0 naj .
SFX 1782 Y 1
SFX 1782 oký šom .
PFX 1782 Y 1
PFX 1782 0 naj .
SFX 1783 Y 1
SFX 1783 oký ším .
PFX 1783 Y 1
PFX 1783 0 naj .
SFX 1784 Y 1
SFX 1784 oký ších .
PFX 1784 Y 1
PFX 1784 0 naj .
SFX 1785 Y 1
SFX 1785 oký šími .
PFX 1785 Y 1
PFX 1785 0 naj .
SFX 1786 Y 1
SFX 1786 oký šie .
PFX 1786 Y 1
PFX 1786 0 naj .
